Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.220

Appointing a guardian or issuing a protective order.

A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for a respondent if:

(1) This state is the respondent's home state;

(2) On the date the petition is filed, this state is a significant-connection state and:

(a) The respondent does not have a home state or a court of the respondent's home state has declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is a more appropriate forum; or

(b) The respondent has a home state, a petition for an appointment or order is not pending in a court of that state or another significant-connection state, and, before the court makes the appointment or issues the order:

(i) A petition for an appointment or order is not filed in the respondent's home state;

(ii) An objection to the court's jurisdiction is not filed by a person required to be notified of the proceeding; and

(iii) The court in this state concludes that it is an appropriate forum under the factors set forth in RCW 11.90.250;

(3) This state does not have jurisdiction under either subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the respondent's home state and all significant-connection states have declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is the more appropriate forum, and jurisdiction in this state is consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States; or

(4) The requirements for special jurisdiction under RCW 11.90.230 are met.

[ 2009 c 81 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.